csv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_IND_e.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx: ate
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx: atewan
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv: ateni
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv: ateniwan
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx: atesinoon
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx: atesinoon
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv: atesinini
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv: atesininiwan
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx: ateban
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx: [atebaniin,atebanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv: ateniiban
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv: [ateniibaniin,ateniibanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx: atesinooban
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx: [atesinoobaniin,atesinoobanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv: atesininiiban
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv: [atesininiibaniin,atesininiibanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx: atedog
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx: atedogenan
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv: ateniwidog
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv: ateniwidogenan
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx: atesinodog
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx: atesinodogenan
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv: atesininiwidog
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv: atesininiwidogenan
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgProx: ategoban
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0PlProx: [ategobaniin,ategobanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgObv: atenigoban
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0PlObv: [atenigobaniin,atenigobanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgProx: atesinoogoban
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0PlProx: [atesinoogobaniin,atesinoogobanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgObv: atesininigoban
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0PlObv: [atesininigobaniin,atesininigobanen]
